District of Columbia statutes.
28-3601

Direct motor vehicle installment loans.

The provisions of the Act approved April 22, 1960 (Public Law 86-431, 74 Stat. 69; D.C. Code, 1967 Ed., Chapter 9 of Title 40, [Chapter 6 of Title 50, 2001 Ed.]), covering installment sales of motor vehicles, as amended, and the regulations issued thereunder, shall apply to the extent appropriate to, a direct installment loan, secured by a security interest in a motor vehicle, made by a federally insured bank or savings and loan association doing business in the District of Columbia, subject to section 28-3602 .

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 666, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4
1973 Ed., § 28-3601.
1981 Ed., § 28-3601.
Automobile Consumer Protection Act, see § 50-501.